District of Columbia statutes.
16-5503

Special motion to quash.

(a)

A person whose personal identifying information is sought, pursuant to a discovery order, request, or subpoena, in connection with a claim arising from an act in furtherance of the right of advocacy on issues of public interest may make a special motion to quash the discovery order, request, or subpoena.

(b)

If a person bringing a special motion to quash under this section makes a prima facie showing that the underlying claim arises from an act in furtherance of the right of advocacy on issues of public interest, then the motion shall be granted unless the party seeking his or her personal identifying information demonstrates that the underlying claim is likely to succeed on the merits, in which case the motion shall be denied.

History

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-351, § 4, 58 DCR 741
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 401, 59 DCR 6190

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-5504.

Editor's Notes

Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this chapter into law.